Tennessee, session 114, HB0958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-103(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "July 10 each year" and substituting "July 20 of each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0958
000475
- 1 -